Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-1102
Issue of fact; how formed.

An issue of fact arises upon a material allegation in a pleading that is denied by a responsive pleading or that is considered as denied or avoided because no responsive pleading is required or permitted.

R.S.1867, Code § 278, p. 440;

R.S.1913, § 7841;

C.S.1922, § 8785;

C.S.1929, § 20-1102;

R.S.1943, § 25-1102;

Laws 2002, LB 876, § 24.

A general denial in answer puts in issue only such pleaded facts as are necessary to enable plaintiff to recover. Luikart v. Bank of Benkelman, 132 Neb. 501, 272 N.W. 324 (1937).

Party is as much entitled to be heard in trial court upon questions of law as upon issues of fact. Wagener v. Whitmore, 79 Neb. 558, 113 N.W. 238 (1907).

Where facts, though not conflicting, would cause impartial minds to draw different conclusions, question to be determined is not one of law for court, but one of fact. Southern Pine Lumber Co. v. Fries, 1 Neb. Unof. 691, 96 N.W. 71 (1901).